Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.190

Rights and duties of warehouse operator—Rebates, preferences, etc., prohibited.

No warehouse operator subject to the provisions of this chapter may:

(1) Directly or indirectly, by any special charge, rebate, drawback, or other device, demand, collect, or receive from any person a greater or lesser compensation for any service rendered or to be rendered in the handling, conditioning, storage, or shipment of any commodity than he or she demands, collects, or receives from any other person for doing for him or her a like and contemporaneous service in the handling, conditioning, storage, or shipment of any commodity under substantially similar circumstances or conditions;

(2) Make or give any undue or unreasonable preference or advantage to any person in any respect whatsoever;

(3) Subject any particular person to any undue or unreasonable prejudice or disadvantage in any respect whatsoever.

[ 2011 c 336 s 614; 1983 c 305 s 35; 1963 c 124 s 19.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 305: See note following RCW 20.01.010.